ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTELTKI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTENA
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTENAGI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTENI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTENIGI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTES
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTESKI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTESSE
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTESSEGI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTEST
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTESTKI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTETA
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTETAGI
	[AEIU] N U D	>	-NUD,VUSTKI

# rule/flag 61 (affects 12445 words, has 46 subrules):
flag g:
	E G A	>	-GA,DE
	E G A	>	-GA,DEGA
	E G A	>	-GA,DEGAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DEKS
	E G A	>	-GA,DEKSKI
	E G A	>	-GA,DEL
	E G A	>	-GA,DELE
	E G A	>	-GA,DELEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DELGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DELT
	E G A	>	-GA,DELTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,DENA
	E G A	>	-GA,DENAGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DENI
	E G A	>	-GA,DENIGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DES
	E G A	>	-GA,DESKI
	E G A	>	-GA,DESSE
	E G A	>	-GA,DESSEGI
	E G A	>	-GA,DEST
	E G A	>	-GA,DESTKI
	E G A	>	-GA,DETA
	E G A	>	-GA,DETAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,DKI
	E G A	>	-GA,SID
	E G A	>	-GA,SIDKI
	A G A	>	-GA,TKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,I
	L N U D	>	-NUD,ID
	L N U D	>	-NUD,IDKI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,IGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,IME
	L N U D	>	-NUD,IMEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,IN
	L N U D	>	-NUD,INGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,ITE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,ITEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,LA
	L N U D	>	-NUD,LAGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,LAKSE
	L N U D	>	-NUD,LAKSEGI
	L N U D	>	-NUD,LES
	L N U D	>	-NUD,LESKI
	A N U D	>	-NUD,MA
	A N U D	>	-NUD,VAT

# rule/flag 941 (affects 23755 words, has 259 subrules):
flag h:
	E G A	>	-GA,D
	A G A	>	-GA,DE
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DEGA
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DEGAGI
	A G A	>	-GA,DEGI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DEKS
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DEKSKI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DEL
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DELE
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DELEGI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DELGI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DELT
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DELTKI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DENA
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DENAGI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DENI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DENIGI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DES
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DESKI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DESSE
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DESSEGI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DEST
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DESTKI
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DETA
	[AU] G A	>	-GA,DETAGI
	U G A	>	-GA,SID
	U G A	>	-GA,SIDKI
	I G A	>	-GA,TKI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,B
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,BKI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,D
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,DKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ES
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ESKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EV
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSED
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEDKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEGA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEGAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEID
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIDKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIGA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIGAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIKS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIKSKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIL
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEILE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEILEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEILGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEILT
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEILTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEINA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEINAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEINI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEINIGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEISKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEISSE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEISSEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEIST
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEISTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEITA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEITAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEKS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEKSKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEL
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSELE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSELEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSELGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSELT
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSELTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSENA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSENAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSENI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSENIGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSES
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSESKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSESSE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSESSEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSEST
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSESTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSETA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSETAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIGA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIGAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIKS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIKSKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIL
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSILE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSILEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSILGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSILT
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSILTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSINA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSINAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSINI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSINIGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSISKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSISSE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSISSEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSIST
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSISTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSITA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSITAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSSE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSSEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUST
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEGA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEGAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEKS
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEKSKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEL
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTELE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTELEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTELGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTELT
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTELTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTENA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTENAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTENI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTENIGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTES
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTESKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTESSE
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTESSEGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTEST
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTESTKI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTETA
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTETAGI
	[LST] N U D	>	-NUD,EVUSTKI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,GI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,IS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,ISKI
	S N U D	>	-NUD,KE
	S N U D	>	-NUD,KEGI
	S N U D	>	-NUD,KEM
	S N U D	>	-NUD,KEMGI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KS
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSID
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSIDKI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSIME
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSIMEGI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSIN
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSINGI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSITE
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSITEGI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,KSKI
	S N U D	>	-NUD,KU
	S N U D	>	-NUD,KUGI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,ME
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,MEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAGU
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAGUGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAKSE
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAKSEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAMA
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAMAGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAV
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAVAT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAVATKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TAVGI
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,TE
	[AIU] N U D	>	-NUD,TEGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TUD
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TUDKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TUKS
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TUKSKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TUVAT
	E N U D	>	-NUD,TUVATKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAD
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VADKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAGA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAGAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAID
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIDKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIGA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIGAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIKS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIKSKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIL
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAILE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAILEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAILGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAILT
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAILTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAINA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAINAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAINI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAINIGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAISKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAISSE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAISSEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAIST
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAISTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAITA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAITAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAKS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAKSKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAL
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VALE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VALEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VALGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VALT
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VALTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VANA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VANAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VANI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VANIGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VASKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VASSE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VASSEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VAST
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VASTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEGA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEGAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEKS
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEKSKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEL
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATELE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATELEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATELGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATELT
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATELTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATENA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATENAGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATENI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATENIGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATES
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATESKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATESSE
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATESSEGI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATEST
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATESTKI
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATETA
	T N U D	>	-NUD,VATETAGI
