ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
ajaldisusega/abehklmny
akustikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
analüsaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
apaatiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
arvestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
asunikuga/acdegimy
bakalaureusega/abhilmny
budistlikuga/acdegjlmy
deklamaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
drakoonilisusega/abehklmny
edvistelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
eksudatiivsusega/abehklmny
ennemaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
esemelisega/abdhjlmny
fenomenoloogiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
formaatimisega/abhilmny
gürsaga/abcdfghiky
haamerjusega/abehklmny
happetuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
haruldasusega/abehklmny
hellitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hiilgega/abehiklmny
hoobajaga/abcdefgkmnoy
humoraalsusega/abehklmny
hämmastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hügroskoopilisusega/abehklmny
hüpertroofiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
imbega/abehiklmny
inaraga/abcdefgikmnoy
iraanlasega/abehiklmny
jampslikuga/acdegjlmy
jooksutusega/abhilmny
jutlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
järjestunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jõutamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
kaenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kahjutustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kalmusega/abehiklmny
kangestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
karusega/abdehijklmnoy
kasutatavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
keetega/abehiklmny
keiserlikuga/acdegjlmy
kihitisega/abdhjlmny
kiidetamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
kiputavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kirevusega/abehiklmny
klirinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
klõpsatusega/abhilmny
kolbitsaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kolloidsusega/abehklmny
kontiinumiga/abcehijlmoy
koonerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
korraldusega/abhilmny
kraksuga/acdeghimy
kroketiga/abcehijlmoy
ksantopsiaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kummalisusega/abehklmny
kurruga/acdegimy
kädisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
käppajaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kõhrega/abghilmny
kõlbamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
kördisega/abdehjklmnoy
köögerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ladvikuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
laevalisusega/abehklmny
laotavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
lapulisega/abhilmny
leiboristlikuga/acdegjlmy
lembusega/abehiklmny
liigutavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
liivlasega/abehiklmny
loetanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
londonlasega/abhilmny
loristanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
läbindanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
läilakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
lõpetavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
lõpetavusega/abehklmny
magneeditamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
mahitavusega/abehklmny
matemaatikuga/abcdefgikmoy
matsuga/acdeghimy
minevikulisega/abdhjlmny
mingituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
mullastikulisega/abdhjlmny
murustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mättalisusega/abehklmny
mõistlikuga/acdegjlmy
mürtjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
müütilisusega/abehklmny
neegerlikuga/acdegjlmy
nihukesega/abdhjlmny
nooremaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
numbriga/abcehijlmoy
näitamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
nõlvaga/abcfhiky
nõutuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
odaga/abcfhiky
oluga/acdeghimy
oodatavaga/abcdefgijklmnoy
padisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
paigutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
paniga/abcefhijkly
parasiitlikuga/acdegjlmy
peekoniga/abcehijlmoy
pekslejaga/abcdefgkmnoy
piimaga/abcfhiky
piitsutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
plaanindusega/abhilmny
plahvatuslikuga/acdegjlmy
polüuuriaga/abcdefgikmnoy
poolesega/abdehjklmnoy
proletaarlasega/abehiklmny
propagandaga/abcdfghiky
pummeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pumpamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
pärjakuga/abcdefgikmoy
päsmriga/abcehijlmoy
põrutavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
pürgimusega/abhilmny
rahuldavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
rapuntsliga/abcehijlmoy
rehmanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
reostanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ristlevusega/abehklmny
rivedaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
ruugjusega/abehklmny
rüblikuga/abcdefgikmoy
rüütliga/abcehijlmoy
sapsuga/acdeghimy
seiskavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
seljakulisusega/abehklmny
silenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
soenguga/abcdefgikmoy
spargliga/abcehijlmoy
sumanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
säilitusega/abhilmny
sümmeetriaga/abcdefgikmnoy
tahunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
teadjaga/abcdefgikmnoy
territooriumiga/abcefhijklmoy
toetajaga/abcdefgikmnoy
transversaalsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
tuiakaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tähtjusega/abehklmny
tõlgituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
undamisega/abhlmny
untsakaga/abcdefgikmnoy
vangistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
varistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viiksutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viljastusega/abhilmny
vusistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
värvusega/abehiklmny
võtvaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
õllega/abghilmny
ürinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
